Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-423
Actuarial opinions; transition period authorized.

The director may provide for a transition period for establishing any higher reserves which the qualified actuary may deem necessary in order to render the opinion required by section 44-421.

Laws 1994, LB 978, § 10.